California, session 20252026, AB1853.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The voter information guide is an official government publication relied upon by millions of Californians to make informed voting decisions.(2) Candidate statements of qualifications are intended to provide voters with a concise and accurate description of a candidate’s background, education, experience, and qualifications for office.(3) The inclusion of misleading, inflammatory, irrelevant, or harmful content in candidate statements undermines voter trust and the integrity of the electoral process.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish clear, enforceable standards to ensure that candidate statements remain factual, relevant, and appropriate for an official state publication, while respecting constitutional protections of free speech.SEC. 2. Section 13308 of the Elections Code is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 13308 is added to the Elections Code, to read:13308. (a) A candidate statement of qualifications included in either the state voter information guide or county voter information guide shall be limited to a recitation of the candidate’s own:(1) Education.(2) Professional experience.(3) Public service.(4) Community involvement.(5) Qualifications for the office sought.(b) A candidate statement shall not include any of the following:(1) References to other candidates for the same or any other office.(2)Characterizations of other individuals or groups.(3)(2) A link or Uniform Resource Locator (URL) to an internet website, a quick response (QR) code, or any other reference directing voters to external content.(4)(3) Content that is profane or vulgar, or that threatens or incites violence.(5)False statements or misleading claims.(6)(4) Content unrelated to the candidate’s qualifications for office.(5) False statements or misleading claims.(c) A candidate statement shall be deemed final upon the close of the applicable filing period. A candidate shall not revise, supplement, or otherwise modify a candidate statement after the filing deadline.(d) (1) After the candidate statement filing deadline, if it is determined the elections official determines that any portion of a candidate statement does not comply with the standards described in this section, contains any of the content described in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subdivision (b), inclusive, the elections official shall omit the noncompliant portion of the candidate statement shall be omitted from the voter information guide. The remainder of the candidate statement shall be printed in the voter information guide if it can stand independently and does not mislead voters when the noncompliant portion is removed.(2) If the elections official determines that candidate statement cannot reasonably be printed without the noncompliant portion, the elections official shall omit the entire candidate statement may be omitted from the voter information guide.(e) (1) Any fee paid by a candidate for the printing or inclusion of a candidate statement of qualifications in the state or county voter information guide shall be nonrefundable if the statement or a portion of the statement appears in the voter information guide. If the candidate statement is omitted from the voter information guide, the fee paid by the candidate shall be refunded.(2) The submission of payment constitutes acknowledgment and acceptance of the requirements of this section, including the finality of the candidate statement after the filing deadline and the possibility that noncompliant content will be omitted.(3) Except as provided in paragraph (1), a candidate shall not be entitled to a refund, credit, or reimbursement under any circumstances arising from enforcement of the requirements of this section.(f) The elections official shall make reasonable attempts to notify a candidate of the omission of content, and allow a candidate, if notified, to revise the statement so that it does not violate the provisions of this section. The notification process shall not delay the printing or distribution of the voter information guide.(g)(1)The Secretary of State or a county elections official may refuse to print any candidate statement that does not comply with this section.(2)(g) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13313, any Any registered voter may seek appropriate judicial relief pursuant to this subdivision to enforce the requirements of this section.(1) (A) For a candidate statement in the state voter information guide, during the 20-calendar-day period provided by Section 9092, any registered voter may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any or all of the material in a candidate statement to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 20-calendar-day public examination period.(B) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall issue only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of this section, and that issuance of the writ or injunction will not substantially interfere with the printing or distribution of official election materials as provided by law.(C) The Secretary of State shall be named as respondent and the candidate who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest.(2) (A) For a candidate statement in a county voter information guide, during the 10-calendar-day period provided by Section 13313, any voter of the jurisdiction in which the election is being held, or the county elections official of the county that issued the guide, may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any or all of the material in a candidate statement to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 10-calendar-day public examination period.(B) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall issue only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of this section, and that issuance of the writ or injunction will not substantially interfere with the printing or distribution of official election materials as provided by law.(C) The elections official shall be named as respondent and the candidate who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest, unless the elections official is bringing the action, in which case the board of supervisors of the county shall be named as the respondent and the candidate who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest.(3) A court shall give priority to actions brought to enforce the requirements of this section due to the time-sensitive nature of the preparation and distribution of election materials.(h) The Secretary of State or a county elections official shall not be liable for taking or failing to take the actions described in this section.(i) For purposes of this section, “elections official” refers to the Secretary of State, in reference to the state voter information guide, and a county elections official, in reference to the county voter information guide.(i)(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 5. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To ensure that the standards applicable to candidate statements in this act apply for the November 3, 2026, statewide general election, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.